Utah statutes.
9-4-613.   Authorities may join or cooperate.

(1)  Any two or more authorities may cooperate with one another or jointly exercise any or all of their powers for the purpose of financing, issuing bonds and other obligations and giving security for them, planning, undertaking, owning, constructing, operating, or contracting with respect to a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of any one or more of the authorities.

(2)  For this purpose, an authority may by resolution prescribe and authorize any other housing authority or authorities joining or cooperating with it to act on its behalf with respect to any or all powers, as its agent or otherwise, in the name of the authority or authorities that are joining or cooperating or in its own name.

